Louisiana, session 2026, HB653.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:421(B)(10) and (E)(4) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§421. Oyster Task Force
* * *
B. The task force shall be composed as follows:
* * *
(10) Two members appointed by the United Commercial Fisherman's
Association, one of whom shall be a resident of St. Bernard Parish.
* * *
E. The task force is hereby charged with the responsibility to do the
following:
* * *
(4) Make recommendations with respect to issues pertaining to the oyster
industry and oyster production to the various state agencies charged with
responsibility for differing elements of the oyster industry in this state, including the
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries, the Department of Agriculture and Forestry,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 653 ENROLLED
the Department of Conservation and Energy, the Coastal Protection and Restoration
Authority Board, the Coastal Protection and Restoration Authority, the Louisiana
Department of Health, the governor's executive assistant for coastal activities, and
the legislature.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.